Mississippi, session 2026, SB2637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 69-5-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 69-5-103.  For the purposes of this article, the State of Mississippi is hereby divided into five (5) livestock show districts, as follows: (a)  The Northwest District, which shall embrace the Counties of Coahoma, DeSoto, Grenada, Lafayette, Marshall, Panola, Quitman, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tunica and Yalobusha Counties.  The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Batesville, in Panola County. (b)  The North Delta District, which shall embrace the Counties of Attala, Bolivar, Carroll, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Montgomery, Sharkey, Sunflower and Washington Counties.  The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Greenwood, in Leflore County. (c)  The Northeast District, which shall embrace the Counties of Alcorn, Benton, Calhoun, Chickasaw, Choctaw, Clay, Itawamba, Lee, Lowndes, Monroe, Noxubee, Oktibbeha, Pontotoc, Prentiss, Tippah, Tishomingo, Union, Webster and Winston.  The place for holding the livestock show shall be * * * at Verona, in Lee County within the Northeast District. (d)  The Southwest District, which shall embrace the Counties of Adams, Amite, Claiborne, Copiah, Franklin, Hinds, Jefferson, Lawrence, Leake, Lincoln, Madison, Neshoba, Newton, Pike, Rankin, Scott, Simpson, Smith, Walthall, Warren, Wilkinson and Yazoo.  The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Jackson, in Hinds County. (e)  The Southeast District, which shall embrace the Counties of Clarke, Covington, Forrest, George, Greene, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Jasper, Jefferson Davis, Jones, Kemper, Lamar, Lauderdale, Marion, Pearl River, Perry, Stone and Wayne.  The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Hattiesburg, in Forrest County. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.